fi: Luokittelupalvelu: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Ei mitään / sertifioimaton; PCGS; PMG; Muu
pl: Usługa klasyfikacji: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Brak / Niescertyfikowana; PCGS; PMG; Inna
zh-CN: 评分服务: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; 无/未认证; PCGS; PMG; 其他
es: Servicio de calificación: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Ninguno/sin certificar; PCGS; PMG; Otro
pt-PT: Serviço de classificação: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Nenhum/não certificado; PCGS; PMG; Outro
ko: 등급 감정 서비스: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; 없음/미인증; PCGS; PMG; 기타
fr: Service de notation: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Aucun/non certifié; PCGS; PMG; Autre
hu: Minősítési szolgáltatás: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Nincs / Nem tanúsított; PCGS; PMG; Egyéb
ja: グレーディングサービス: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; なし/未鑑定; PCGS; PMG; その他
sv: Graderingstjänst: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Ingen/ocertifierad; PCGS; PMG; Annan
zh-TW: 鑑定分級服務: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; 無/未經認證; PCGS; PMG; 其他
cs: Hodnoticí služba: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Žádná / Neověřeno; PCGS; PMG; Ostatní
lt-LT: Vertinimo paslauga: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Nėra / nesertifikuota; PCGS; PMG; Kita
pt-BR: Serviço de classificação: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Nenhum/Sem certificação; PCGS; PMG; Outro
it: Servizio di valutazione: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Nessuno/Non certificato; PCGS; PMG; Altro
da: Graderingsservice: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Ingen/ucertificeret; PCGS; PMG; Anden
vi: Dịch vụ phân loại: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Không có/Không được chứng nhận; PCGS; PMG; Khác
nl: Grading service: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Geen/ongecertificeerd; PCGS; PMG; Anders
en: Grading service: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; None/Uncertified; PCGS; PMG; Other
bg-BG: Услуга за оценяване: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Без/несертифициран; PCGS; PMG; Друго
sk-SK: Služba klasifikácie: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Žiadne/necertifikované; PCGS; PMG; Iné
ru: Сервис оценки: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Нет/не сертифицировано; PCGS; PMG; Другое
hr-HR: Usluga ocjenjivanja: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Bez / necertificirano; PCGS; PMG; Ostalo
sl-SI: Storitev ocenjevanja: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Brez/necertificirano; PCGS; PMG; Drugo
tr: Derecelendirme hizmeti: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Yok/Sertifikasız; PCGS; PMG; Diğer
de: Bewertungsdienst: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Keine/Unzertifiziert; PCGS; PMG; Andere
th: บริการจัดเกรด: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; ไม่มี/ไม่ได้รับการรับรอง; PCGS; PMG; อื่นๆ
nb: Karaktereringstjeneste: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Ingen / usertifisert; PCGS; PMG; Annet
ro-RO: Serviciu de notare: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Niciunul/necertificat; PCGS; PMG; Altele
el: Υπηρεσία βαθμολόγησης: ANACS; CAC; CGC; ICG; NGC; Καμία/Μη πιστοποιημένο; PCGS; PMG; Άλλο